Nebraska, session 109, LB393.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB393 LB393
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 84-612, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-612 (1) There is hereby created within the state treasury a fund
known as the Cash Reserve Fund which shall be under the direction of the
State Treasurer. The fund shall only be used pursuant to this section.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer funds from the Cash Reserve
Fund to the General Fund upon certification by the Director of
Administrative Services that the current cash balance in the General Fund
is inadequate to meet current obligations. Such certification shall
include the dollar amount to be transferred. Any transfers made pursuant
to this subsection shall be reversed upon notification by the Director of
Administrative Services that sufficient funds are available.
(3) In addition to receiving transfers from other funds, the Cash
Reserve Fund shall receive federal funds received by the State of
Nebraska for undesignated general government purposes, federal revenue
sharing, or general fiscal relief of the state.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer fifteen million eight hundred
forty-one thousand dollars from the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund to the
Cash Reserve Fund on or before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred sixty-six million
six hundred seventy-three thousand five hundred eighty dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or after
July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(4) (6) No funds shall be transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund to
fulfill the obligations created under the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive
Act unless the balance in the Cash Reserve Fund after such transfer will
be at least equal to five hundred million dollars.
-2-

LB393 LB393
2025 2025
(7) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the School Safety and Security Fund as soon as
administratively possible after September 2, 2023, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(8) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Risk Loss Trust on or before June 30, 2024,
on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(9) The State Treasurer shall transfer eleven million three hundred
twenty thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Health and
Human Services Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but on or before June
30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(10) The State Treasurer shall transfer five hundred seventy-four
million five hundred thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the
Perkins County Canal Project Fund on or before June 30, 2024, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(11) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million one hundred
fifteen thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Public Safety
Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(12) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System
Revolving Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(5) (13) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million four hundred
-3-

LB393 LB393
2025 2025
twenty-five thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska
Public Safety Communication System Revolving Fund on or after July 1,
2024, but before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(14) The State Treasurer shall transfer seventy million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery and Investment
Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates
and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(15) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Site and Building Development Fund on or after
July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(16) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Economic Development Cash Fund on or after
July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(17) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred forty million
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Economic Recovery Contingency
Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates
and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(18) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Critical Infrastructure Facilities Cash Fund on
or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(19) The State Treasurer shall transfer four hundred forty million
-4-

LB393 LB393
2025 2025
dollars from the General Fund to the Cash Reserve Fund on or after July
1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(6) (20) The State Treasurer shall transfer four million dollars
from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2024,
but before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(7) (21) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-nine million four
hundred fifty-eight thousand eight hundred dollars from the Cash Reserve
Fund to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or after July 1, 2024,
but before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(22) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million five hundred
thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Materiel Division
Revolving Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(23) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Youth Outdoor Education Innovation Fund on or
after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(24) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-eight million dollars
from the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Fund to the Cash
Reserve Fund on or before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(25) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from
-5-

LB393 LB393
2025 2025
the Cash Reserve Fund to the State Insurance Fund on or before July 10,
2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(8) (26) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million five
hundred thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Health and
Human Services Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but on or before June
30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(27) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million two hundred
fifty thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the State Insurance
Fund as soon as possible after April 2, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(28) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Fund on or
after July 1, 2024, but before July 15, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(9) (29) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-five million
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund
on or before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(10) (30) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars
from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund on or
after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(11) (31) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer two
-6-

LB393 LB393
2025 2025
hundred million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on
or after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, if the balance of the
Cash Reserve Fund on July 1, 2026, after accounting for the transfers in
this section, does not fall below sixteen percent of the amount
appropriated, excluding encumbered and certified reappropriations, from
the General Fund for fiscal year 2026-27.
Sec. 2. Original section 84-612, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-7-